Vermont, session 2025-2026, S252.
It is hereby enacted by the General Assembly of the State of Vermont:
Sec. 1. 20 V.S.A. § 2063 is amended to read:
§ 2063. CRIMINAL HISTORY RECORD FEES; CRIMINAL HISTORY
RECORD CHECK FUND
(a) Except as otherwise provided for in this section, the cost of each check
for a criminal history record as defined in section 2056a of this title or a
criminal conviction record as defined in section 2056c of this title based on
name and date of birth shall be $30.00. Out-of-state criminal history record
VT LEG #385932 v.1

BILL AS INTRODUCED S.252
2026 Page 2 of 3
checks shall include any additional fees charged by the state from which the
record is requested.
(b) Requests made by criminal justice agencies for criminal justice
purposes or other purposes authorized by State or federal law shall be exempt
from all record check fees. The following types of requests shall be exempt
from the Vermont criminal record check fee:
(1) Requests made by any individual, organization, or governmental
body doing business in Vermont that has one or more individuals performing
services for it within this State and is a qualified entity that provides care or
services to children, elders, or persons with disabilities as defined in 34 U.S.C.
§ 40104.
(2) Requests made by researchers approved by the Vermont Crime
Information Center to conduct research related to the administration of
criminal justice. A fee, however, may be charged by the Center, which shall
reflect the cost of generating the requested information.
(3) Requests made by individuals to review their own record at the
Vermont Crime Information Center; however, copies of the individual’s record
are not exempt from the record check fee.
(4) Requests made by the Vermont State Housing Authority and other
public housing authorities pursuant to 24 V.S.A § 4010(c).
VT LEG #385932 v.1

BILL AS INTRODUCED S.252
2026 Page 3 of 3
(5) Requests made by environmental enforcement officers employed by
the Agency of Natural Resources.
(6) Requests made by any organization or agency administering a
program of no-cost home-delivered meals for elderly Vermonters in
connection with the Department of Disabilities, Aging, and Independent
Living.
* * *
Sec. 2. EFFECTIVE DATE
This act shall take effect on July 1, 2026.
VT LEG #385932 v.1